Utah statutes.
16-10a-708.   Meetings by telecommunication.
Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any or all of the shareholders may
participate in an annual or special meeting of shareholders by, or the meeting
may be conducted through the use of, any means of communication by which all
persons participating in the meeting can hear each other during the meeting.
A shareholder participating in a meeting by this means is considered to be
present in person at the meeting.
